Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1816
Authority; members; expenses.

The members of the authority shall receive no compensation for the performance of their duties as members, but each such member shall be reimbursed for expenses while engaged in the performance of such duties as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177 from any funds legally available therefor.

Laws 1997, LB 809, § 16;

Laws 2020, LB381, § 96.